Search
Select your language
English
Support
About us
About HER
Download HER
Partnerships
Careers
HER for all
Transgender dating
Bisexual dating
Lesbian chat
Polyamorous dating
Non-binary dating
Asexual dating
Pansexual dating
Mature lesbian dating
Asian lesbian dating
Black lesbian dating
Bisexual chat
Trans chat
LGBTQIA+ resources
HER blog
LGBTQIA+ Glossary
DM helper
Search
English
Search
Download HER
HER privacy policy
Last Updated: 3/11/2025
Welcome to HER! This Privacy Policy explains how our company, Bloomer Inc., doing business as HER (“
HER
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, or “
our
”) handles Personal Information (as defined below) collected from our website, located at
www.weareher.com
(the “
Website
”) and through the use of our mobile application (the “
Mobile
App
”) (collectively,  the “
Services
”). Our Website provides information about us, allows you to download the Mobile App, and allows you to sign up for our newsletter.
Our Services.
Our Services allow you to connect and communicate with other members of the LGBTQIA+ community for dating, fun, friendships and more!
When we use the phrase “
Personal
Information
” in this Privacy Policy, we mean information that describes or indicates an identified or identifiable individual. When we use the phrase
“
Anonymous
Information
” in this Privacy Policy, we mean information that is not associated with or linked to any Personal Information except as expressly stated in this Policy, and does not enable identification of or contact with individual persons.
Users Outside of the United States.
HER is based in the U.S. If you are a non U.S. user of the Services, by visiting the Website and/or using the Mobile App, you acknowledge and agree that your Personal Information may be transferred to and/or processed in the United States for the purposes identified in this Privacy Policy. In addition, your Personal Information may be processed in the country in which it was collected and in other countries, including the United States, where laws regarding processing of Personal Information may be less stringent than and less protective of Personal Information than the laws in your country. By providing your information and agreeing to the terms of this Privacy Policy, you consent to any such transfer.
Information we collect
Personal information
In general, the Personal
Information we gather enables us to provide the Services to you, to improve and maintain the Services, and to better understand how users interact with the Services.
Specifically, we collect the following types of Personal Information:
Identifiers, such as real name, online identifier, Internet Protocol (“
IP
”) address, email address, account name, or other similar identifiers.
Categories of personal information described in Section 1798.80(e) of the California Civil Code, such as name, physical characteristics or description, telephone number, education, or employment history, credit card number, or any other financial information.
Characteristics of protected classifications under federal law, such as religion, gender (including pregnancy) and age (40 years old and over), or under California law, such as marital status, age, or sexual orientation.
Internet or other electronic network activity information, such as browsing history, search history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with a website, application or advertisement.
Geolocation data.
Audio, electronic, visual information or similar information.
Professional or employment-related information.
Education information.
Inferences drawn from the above categories of information.
The categories of sensitive information include:
Account login in combination with any required security or access code, password, or credentials allowing access to the account.
Information collected and analyzed concerning a consumer’s sex life or sexual orientation.
Contents of mail or text messages, unless we are the intended recipient of the communication.
Precise geolocation data.
When you create a profile, you have the option of adding a name (given, chosen, real, or fake, at your election), photos, a bio, and certain other details about your gender, your sexual orientation and your dating preferences, as well as answering some standard preferences. All of this information is optional. Whatever you choose to add to your profile will be visible to other users of the Mobile App.
Profile and Account Information
.
You can choose to sign up for the Mobile App using different types of Personal Information, and choose which items of your Personal Information you want to share as you otherwise use the Mobile App. To sign up, you can choose to submit your phone number, email, AppleID, or sign up with a Facebook or Instagram account (a “Social Account”). Whichever option you choose, we will collect that information and associate it with your account.
If you sign up with a Social Account, the social platform will share your name, birthdate and email back with us, with your consent, but it will always allow your account to connect with us to authenticate you. If you’d like to disassociate your Social Account form your HER account, you can do so in the app, or by contacting us at
support@weareher.com
.
When you have an account with us, unless you’ve disabled location services, the Mobile App will automatically collect your location when you open it. Upon initial download and sign-in to the account on the Mobile App, we will request consent to access your device location to allow us to find potential matches and other nearby users in the “Meet” and “Nearby” function of the Mobile App.
During signup, we will also request your birth date, which we use to calculate and display your age to other users and confirm you are an adult.
Voluntary Information.
We also collect other types of Personal Information that you provide to us voluntarily, in addition to information that you provide voluntarily to us to populate your profile and use the Mobile App. We may also receive information you volunteer if you choose to contact us via e-mail regarding support for the Services, sign up for the newsletter on the Website, participate in a survey, sign up for an event through a platform like Eventbrite and share your name and email, participate in a Sweepstakes (subject to the applicable Sweepstakes Rules), offer feedback or submit a request for support through the Mobile App.
Usage Information.
We collect certain non-identifiable information about your use of the Mobile App, such as patterns of clicks, session length, messaging patterns and other similar technical information (“
Usage Information
”) when you use it. When you use the Website, this may include your browser type, operating system, device type, IP address (a number that is automatically assigned to your device when you use the Internet, which may vary from session to session), a date/time stamp for your visit, and/or other similar technical information.
Analytics Information
.
Under some circumstances when you use the Mobile App, this Usage Information is collected in association with Personal Information through the function of third party services we use to improve the business (when so combined, “
Analytics
Information
”). We use Analytics Information to understand our users’ behavior and improve the Services. For example, services that help us analyze users’ messaging behaviors may do so according to demographic or Personal Information. We use analytics to understand how many visitors our Website has and where they come from. As another example, we may use a third party service to examine which of
our marketing efforts our
users interact with and how this impacts users’ journeys through our
Services. The Analytics In
formation used by such third party services may be both stored and accessed by the third party operators of these services, and may be sent to and/or shared with our own servers and cloud providers, as further described below. HER team members may also access part of all of this Analytics Information in the course of our company’s use of these services. At times, our analytics services may consult or ingest Usage Information, and may do so in a manner that causes it to be associated with your Personal Information.
When we do so, we generally secure contractual promises to keep our user data confidential and use it only for the purpose of delivering services to us.
For example, we currently use a service called
Branch
to understand how users find our Mobile App. Branch generates URLs for use in our marketing campaigns, and when users click those links, a persistent identifier is placed onto the user’s device (including mobile devices) to indicate to us (1) the source of the marketing lead, (2) whether that user has created an account, (3) and whether the user has made a purchase and/or a swipe. To read more detailed information about Branch’s services and the data handling practices applicable to all users of those services, visit Branch’s privacy policy
here
and consult Branch’s terms of service.
We also currently use a service called
Braze
to help understand our advertising interactions with users, analyze messaging behaviors in the Mobile App, and manage our marketing campaigns. Braze recreates our databases of this information locally in order to run this analysis, help us plan push notifications and other communications with users, and understand certain user interactions in the Mobile App. You can read more details about Braze’s confidentiality protections and use restrictions in their
Terms of Service
,
and more about their data handling practices in their
Privacy
Policy
. At times, we may input Voluntary Information into these services to improve their functionality.
Cookies
. Like many online services, we use cookies to collect information. “
Cookies
” are small pieces of information that a website sends to your computer’s hard drive while you are viewing the Website. We may use both session Cookies (which expire once you close your web browser) and persistent Cookies (which stay on your computer until they expire or you delete them). Our Website, or our emails to you, may contain similar “web beacon” or “clear GIF” elements which tell us when an email has been acted upon (such as opened or forwarded).
We may use Google Analytics. We use the information we get from Google Analytics only to improve the Website. We do not combine the information collected through the use of Google Analytics with Personal Information. Please refer to Google’s
Privacy Policy
for more information. You may also choose to download the
Google Analytics opt-out browser add-on
.
You may wish to restrict the use of cookies. Please be aware that some of the features of our Website may not function correctly if you disable cookies. Most modern browsers allow you to change your cookie settings. You can usually find these settings in the options or preferences menu of your browser. To understand these settings, the following links for commonly used browsers may be helpful:
Cookie settings in Chrome
Cookie settings in Firefox
Cookie settings in Microsoft Edge
Cookie settings in Safari web
and
iOS
Location Information
.
If you have enabled location services on your phone, we collect precise geolocation information from your device. We share this information as rough geolocation to give users you interact with an approximate estimate of their distance from you.  If you do not want this information collected by us, you can disable location services on your phone for the Mobile App. If location services are not enabled for the Mobile App, you won’t be able to see any other users in the “Meet” or “Nearby” functions of the app.
Other.
We may also collect Personal Information at other points through our Services that state that Personal Information will be collected as a result of a specific action you take.
Collection of Data by Advertisers on our Mobile App
.
We may also use third parties to serve ads on the Services. Your Account Information and Usage Information may be used by these third parties to choose advertisements likely to be relevant for you. We follow the guidelines of mobile application platforms (the Apple App Store and Google Play Store) in serving targeted advertisements to you through the Mobile App in connection with these third parties. For more information, please see the “How to update, access, and modify your personal information in-app” and “How to opt out” sections below.
How we use information we’ve collected
Personal information
We will use your Personal Information, both directly and in connection with the third party services described in this Policy, to:
Identify you as a user in our system;
Facilitate the creation of, payment for, and administration of your Account;
Allow you to communicate with other users of the Services;
To send you push notifications, when enabled;
Provide you with the Services and complete your transactions;
Provide you with customer support and respond to your support inquiries;
Operate marketing campaigns to users and prospective users, including through the use of third party tools like Mailchimp to distribute those campaigns;
Send you our newsletters, when you sign up;
Understand how you interact with our marketing content and/or begin using the Mobile App;
Understand your needs and tailor the features and content of the Services to you;
Respond to and, as applicable, fulfill your requests, resolve disputes and/or troubleshoot problems;
Verify your compliance with your obligations in our Terms of Service;
Send you administrative e-mail notifications, such as security, or support and maintenance advisories and otherwise communicate with you about the Services;
Send surveys, offers, and other promotional materials related to our Services and for other marketing purposes on our own behalf;
Improve the quality and functionality of the Services, identify new features that may be of interest to you and other users, analyze aggregate usage trends for the Services and our industry, and maintain and secure our systems:
To display your friends to other users, if and when you add friends;
To understand your messaging behavior and the messaging behavior of our users as a whole, including with respect to advertising messages;
To identify and deliver our own marketing messages to you;
To understand how and when users of the Mobile App interact with our offline content and promotional activities;
To ask you to consider using the Mobile App following an offline interaction with us where you shared Voluntary Information, such as registering for an Eventbrite event;
To allow other users to share, report, or block your profile; and
Select and display relevant advertisements of third party products and services that may be of interest to you, in compliance with guidelines and restrictions imposed by the App Store and Play Store platforms.
We may also use your Personal Information to extract Anonymous Information records by excluding information that would allow the identification of any particular individual. We generally use Anonymous Information, which is not associated with an identifiable individual, that we collect to analyze trends, administer and improve the Services, understand the demographics of our aggregate user base, and tailor the Services to our users’ needs. We may use Anonymous Information in other ways, including sharing it publicly. This may include sharing anonymous statements by our users about the product or Services.
How we disclose and share information
Personal information
We do not disclose or share your Personal Information with third parties other than as described in this Policy. In addition to the sharing described as a part of how we collect data, we may disclose certain Personal Information to third parties in the following ways:
As You Request. When you use the Services, the Personal Information you provide will be shared with the third parties that you authorize to receive such information (e.g., other individuals that you wish to connect with via the Services). You choose which information about you will be displayed to possible connections in the Services.
Spotify. You can, but do not have to, choose to connect your Spotify account to your Mobile App profile to display music you listen to frequently.
Social Media Profiles. If you use your Facebook and/or Instagram accounts to log into the
Mobile App, yo
u can choose to import certain data from those accounts to improve your
experience on th
e Mobile App.
Service Providers. We may share your Personal Information with our third party service providers who provide services such as data analytics, website hosting, payment processing (e.g., Stripe and RevenueCat), information technology, customer service, email delivery, auditing, and other services. In particular:
Servers and Hosting. Like most modern applications, our Services use cloud-based server and hosting tools operated by third parties, and your Personal Information is stored on those third party servers. Our servers and databases, as well as the data we store there, are secured and encrypted with industry-standard tools. In some cases, we also use data analysis tools which replicate our server and/or some data on those servers in order to help us optimize our operations.
Data processing and Analysis. We use certain third party software tools to analyze, visualize, and process data about our Services and how users interact with them, as well as to transmit that data effectively to cloud servers. The third party vendors may store or have access to your Personal Information for the purpose of providing their services to us. Data handled by these vendors is subject to Encryption of at least TLSv1.2 in transit and AES Encryption at rest. Services that help us manage data flows (for example, data pipeline, data handling, and data visualization services operated by third parties) generally do not store our data, but many have access to it in the course of delivering their services.
Subscription Management. We use a third party service, RevenueCat, to help manage and analyze subscription revenue. You can read more about RevenueCat’s Privacy Practices with respect to you as a HER user in their Privacy Policy
here
.
Ad Display. We may share your Personal Information in order to select and display targeted advertisements. Currently, vendors such as
AppLovin
provide services for this purpose, though the particular vendors we use may change over time. You can read AppLovin’s Privacy Policy
here
.
You may opt out of receiving interest-based advertising by emailing support@weareher.com. Please read the Section below on “How to opt out” for more details about this.
If you would like more information about these targeted advertising services and the choices about the use of your information they support, please visit
http://www.aboutads.info/choices
or
http://www.networkadvertising.org
. If you’re in the EU, you can find additional information about your choices with respect to advertising networks and online behavioral advertising by clicking here:
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/.
Using these general opt-out tools will remove your information from certain services we use, such as Braze.
Public Profile and Profile Sharing. Certain portions of the information you provide to us may also be displayed in your Profile.  As an essential element of the Services, most of the Personal Information you choose to explicitly provide to us when you register or update your Profile is displayed on your Profile and therefore to other users of the Mobile App. You can make your profile “Incognito” by toggling the radio button for that Setting in the “Edit Profile” Display, which is accessible by clicking “Edit” in the top right corner of your profile screen within the Mobile App. You can block specific users from interacting with you on the Mobile App by clicking “Block” at the bottom of their profile, and Report users who are not in compliance with our
Community Guidelines
or who take action which makes you in any way uncomfortable from the link at the bottom of their profile as well.
Finally, you and other users can share a profile via text message or email – and your own profile can be shared publicly in this way.
When another user takes this action, your primary profile photo, first name, and age will display to the recipient of the share. However, clicking the link associated with this display will only open the shared profile in our Mobile App for another registered user of HER. We cannot control who reads your postings, takes screenshots of your data and photos, or what other users may do with the information that you voluntarily post, including another user’s profile, so it is very important that you do not put Personal Information in your messages, posts, and/or profile that you are uncomfortable having shared by other users. Once you have posted information publicly, you may not be able to edit or delete such information cached, collected, and stored elsewhere by others.
Affiliates. We may share some or all of your Personal Information with our parent company, subsidiaries, joint ventures, or other companies under a common control (“
Affiliates
”).
Corporate Restructuring. We may share some or all of your Personal Information in connection with or during negotiation of any merger, financing, acquisition or dissolution, transaction or proceeding involving sale, transfer, divestiture, or disclosure of all or a portion of our business or assets. In the event of an insolvency, bankruptcy, or receivership, Personal Information may also be transferred as a business asset. If another company acquires our company, business, or assets, that company will possess the Personal Information collected by us and will assume the rights and obligations regarding your Personal Information as described in this Privacy Policy, as updated from time to time.
Other Disclosures. Regardless of any choices you make regarding your Personal Information (as described below), we may disclose Personal Information if we believe in good faith that such disclosure is necessary to (a) resolve disputes, investigate problems, or enforce our
Terms and Conditions
or
Community Guidelines
; (b) comply with relevant laws or to respond to requests from law enforcement or other government officials relating to investigations or alleged illegal activity, in which case we can (and you authorize us to) disclose Personal Information without subpoenas or warrants served on us; or (c) protect and defend our rights or property or the rights and property of you or third parties; and/or (d) investigate or assist in preventing any violation or potential violation of the law, this Privacy Policy, or our
Terms and Conditions
, or harm (including potential harm) to HER or other users.
How we respond to Do Not Track (“DNT”) signals
Your browser settings may allow you to automatically transmit a Do Not Track signal to websites and other online services you visit. We do not alter our practices when we receive a Do Not Track signal from a visitor’s browser because we do not track our visitors to provide targeted advertising on the Website. To find out more about Do Not Track, please visit
http://www.allaboutdnt.com.
Privacy rights & additional disclosures for certain U.S. residents
Several jurisdictions grant state residents certain rights and disclosures. We provide the following information to help you further understand your potential privacy rights. If you would like to exercise any rights or inquire as to whether such rights are available to you, please email us at
support@weareher.com
.
Request for Information or Deletion.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to know whether we are processing your Personal Information, and in some instances, you have the right to request we disclose to you the categories listed below for the preceding 12 months. We have the right to request verification of your identity for all requests for information. In responding to this right, we shall provide to you:
The categories of Personal Information we collect about you.
The categories of sources from which your Personal Information is collected.
The business or commercial purpose(s) for collecting, selling, sharing or disclosing your Personal Information, and the categories of Personal Information disclosed for such purpose(s).
The categories of third parties with whom we share your Personal Information.
The categories of Personal Information we have sold, if any, about you and the categories of third parties to whom your Personal Information was sold, by category or categories of Personal Information for each third party to whom the Personal Information was sold.
The specific pieces of Personal Information we have collected about you.
In addition, you may have the right to request we delete your Personal Information.
Request for Correction.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to request the correction or rectification of inaccurate information in the resident’s Personal Information.
Request for Portable Data.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to receive, in certain circumstances, a portable format of their Personal Information that allows the data to be transmitted to another entity.
Do Not Sell or Share my Personal Information.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to opt out of the sale or sharing of the consumer’s Personal Information. We do not sell your Personal Data. However, we may use your Personal Data to provide personalized or targeted advertising. In such circumstances, you may have the right to direct us not to share your personal information for such purposes.
If you wish to opt out of this sharing of your Personal Information for personalized or targeted advertising, please visit this webpage: Your Privacy Choices
Limiting the Use of Sensitive Personal Information.
Residents of California have the right to direct us to use or disclose the sensitive personal information only for providing goods or services, or as otherwise minimally permitted under applicable law. You can exercise this right by visiting this webpage: Your Privacy Choices.
Third Party’s Direct Marketing.
If you are a California customer, California Civil Code 1798.83 permits you to request information regarding the disclosure of your Personal Information to third parties for third parties’ direct marketing purposes. To make such a request, please contact us at
support@weareher.com
.
Automated Processing & Profiling.
Residents of certain U.S. states have the right to opt out of the processing of Personal Information for purposes of profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer.
Right to Equal Service & Price.
You have the right to receive equal service and price, even if you exercise a privacy right.
Verification Process for Exercising Rights.
To protect our consumers’ privacy, we verify privacy rights requests to ensure that only you (or your authorized agent) can exercise rights pertaining to your Personal Information. As part of our verification process, we may ask that you submit additional information.
If you are an authorized agent wishing to exercise rights on behalf of a state resident, please contact us using the information at the bottom of this Privacy Policy and provide us with a copy of the consumer’s written authorization designating you as their agent. We may need to verify your identity and place of residence before completing your rights request.
Appeal Process.
In certain cases, we may decline to take action on your request as permitted by law. Should we decline your request, we will provide you with a written explanation of the reasons for your decision and the opportunity to appeal the decision.
If we deny your appeal, we will provide a written explanation of our decision with instructions on how to contact your local Attorney General or Department of Justice for further review, where permitted under certain U.S. state privacy laws.
Privacy rights & additional disclosures for EEA, Swiss & UK residents
EEA, UK or Swiss Individuals’ Rights.
If you are from the EEA, UK or Switzerland, you have the right, under certain circumstances, to:
Access your Personal Information;
Correct inaccurate information in your Personal Information;
Request erasure of your Personal Information without undue delay;
Request restriction of, in certain circumstances, the processing of your Personal Information;
Request receiving a portable copy of your Personal Information held by us, and to have that portable copy transmitted to another controller; and
To object to the processing of your Personal Information.
To exercise any of these rights, contact us using the contact details provided at the end of this Privacy Policy, and please specify which privacy right(s) you wish to exercise. We may need to verify your identity to honor your request.
Lawful Bases
.
We will only collect and process Personal Information where we have lawful bases. Lawful bases include consent (where you have given consent), contract (where processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you (e.g. to operate the site or deliver any products or services you have requested)) and “legitimate interests.” We rely on our legitimate interests as our lawful basis only where those interests are not overridden by the impact on you (unless we have your consent or our processing is otherwise required or permitted by law). If you have questions about the lawful bases of how we process your Personal Information, contact us at
support@weareher.com
.
International Transfers of Data.
Any data that you provide to us may be accessed, shared, or processed by our offices, located in the United States, and service providers located in the United States, if such data transfer is necessary for the specific purpose for which you submitted your data (such as the provision of goods or services under a written contract).
This may entail a transfer of your Personal Information across international borders. The data protection standards may differ and be lower than the standards enforced in your jurisdiction. We maintain appropriate safeguards as required by applicable law for any Personal Information transferred internationally.
Right to Lodge a Complaint.
If you have any issues with our compliance, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the appropriate supervisory authorities. We would, however, appreciate the opportunity to first address your concerns and would welcome you directing an inquiry to us via the information in the “Contact Us” section at the bottom of this Privacy Policy.
Children’s Privacy
Our Services are not directed to children and no one under the age of 18 is eligible to use our Services. You are only able to join the Services with a birthdate that indicates you are over 18.
Protecting the privacy of children is very important to us. We do not collect or maintain Personal Information from people we know are under 16 years of age under any circumstances, and no part of our Services is designed to attract people under 16 years of age. If we learn that a user is under 16 years of age and has misrepresented their birthday to us, we will take steps to promptly remove that user’s Personal Information from our databases and to prevent the user from utilizing the Services. Please notify us immediately at support@weareher.com if you believe we have inadvertently collected information about any person age 16 or younger.
How to update, access, and modify your personal information in-app
We provide you with a simple tool in the Mobile App to control your information through your settings menu.
To access this tool, from your profile, click the settings icon at the top right. From your profile settings, scroll down to “Privacy Options” and tap. From here, you can choose “Send me my data,” “Stop using my data,” or “Delete my account and data.”
Send me my data. When you select this option, we’ll email you a copy of the data we hold about you. Note that to use the “Send me my data” function, you’ll need to have added an email to your profile and verified that email. We’ll send your data only to verified emails.
Stop using my data. When you select this option, we’ll stop using your data to serve ads to you. You may still see ads, but they won’t be personalized.
Delete my account and my data.  When you select this option, we’ll delete your account and the data it contains. Note that you won’t be able to use your account after doing this.
How to opt out
In addition to the standard mechanisms above for managing your data, if you’d like to opt out of a particular use of your data described in this Privacy Policy, you can email us at
support@weareher.com
.
Data security and retention
We implement a variety of security measures to maintain the safety of your Personal Information when you enter, submit, or access your Personal Information. However, no website, application or transmission can guarantee security. Thus, while we have established and maintain what we believe to be appropriate technical and organizational measures to protect the confidentiality, security, and integrity of Personal Information obtained through the Services, we cannot ensure or warrant the security of any information you transmit to us.
We retain information about you for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes outlined in this Privacy Policy. When the information is no longer necessary for these purposes, we delete it or keep it in a form that does not identify you, unless we are required by law to keep this information for a longer period. When determining the retention period, we take into account various criteria, such as the type of Services requested by or provided to you, the nature and length of our relationship with you, possible re-enrollment with our Services, the impact on the Services we provide to you if we delete some of the information from or about you, mandatory retention periods provided by law, and the statute of limitations.
Changes to this privacy policy
This Privacy Policy may be updated from time to time for any reason. We will notify you of any material changes to our Privacy Policy by posting the new Privacy Policy at
www.weareher.com/privacy
and we will change the “Last Updated” date above. You should consult this Privacy Policy regularly for any changes.
Contact Us
We are here to help answer any questions you have about the Services and how we use your Personal Information. If you have any questions, concerns, or complaints about our Privacy Policy or our data collection or processing practices, or if you want to report any security issues to us, please contact us at
support@weareher.com
.
You can reach our offices and our data protection lead at:
Attn: Privacy
Unit #4315,
2261 Market Street
San Francisco, CA, 94114
Copyright 2022 Bloomer Inc
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.braze.com/company/legal/privacy:
Legal
/
Privacy Policy...
Privacy Policy
For individuals interested in learning more about how we handle personal data related to job applications and recruitment, please
refer to our Candidate Privacy Policy for detailed information on our privacy practices
.
Last Updated:
February 27, 2025
TABLE OF CONTENTS
PART I. GENERAL INFORMATION
1.1 OUR COMMITMENT TO PRIVACY
1.2 INTRODUCTION TO BRAZE
1.3 SCOPE OF THIS POLICY
PART II. DATA COLLECTION AND USE
2.1 DATA COLLECTION
2.2 PURPOSES OF PROCESSING
2.3 DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION TO THIRD PARTIES
PART III. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS, SECURITY AND DATA RETENTION
3.1 PROCESSING OF PERSONAL DATA IN THE U.S. AND ELSEWHERE
3.2 SECURITY
3.3 DATA RETENTION
PART IV. YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
4.1 EXERCISING YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
4.2 PRIVACY RIGHTS AND BRAZE CUSTOMERS
4.3 MARKETING AND ADVERTISING
4.4 COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
4.5 CHAT TECHNOLOGIES
PART V. LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA
PART VI. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
6.1 YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS.
6.2 CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA THAT WE COLLECT AND THIRD PARTIES TO WHOM THE DATA MAY BE DISCLOSED
6.3 THE SALE AND SHARING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
6.4 SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION AND DE-IDENTIFIED DATA
PART VII. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR JAPANESE VISITORS
7.1 PERSONAL DATA DISCLOSURE
7.2 BRAZE JAPAN’S INFORMATION
PART VIII. OTHER IMPORTANT INFORMATION
8.1 CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
8.2 CHILDREN
8.3 HOW TO CONTACT US
PART I. GENERAL INFORMATION
1.1 OUR COMMITMENT TO PRIVACY
Your privacy is important to us and maintaining your trust is one of our highest priorities. This Privacy Policy provides you with a description of how we collect and use data relating to or identifying individuals (“
Personal Data
”). We also provide information on privacy rights, how to exercise these rights and how to contact us with any questions.
1.2 INTRODUCTION TO BRAZE
Braze is a U.S. company, headquartered in New York, with global operations. A reference to “
Braze
,” “
we
,” “
us
” or the “
Company
” is a reference to Braze, Inc. and the relevant affiliate(s) involved in the processing activity.
Braze is a life-cycle engagement platform for companies around the world, supporting stronger relationships between brands and their clients, primarily by leveraging first party data to personalize and automate life-cycle marketing campaigns through first party channels, such as email, SMS, mobile and web push notifications, and in-app/in-browser messaging.
More information about Braze can be found on our
main website
. For details specific to our services in Japan, please visit the
Braze Japan website
.
1.3 SCOPE OF THIS POLICY
What is in Scope?
This Privacy Policy applies to Braze, where we determine the purposes and means of the processing of Personal Data for our marketing or business purposes (further details below) and in such capacity, we will use the term “Data Controller”.
What is not in Scope?
Our Websites and Services are intended to be used by businesses and their representatives. We do not offer any products or services to individuals for personal, family or household use. All Personal Data that we process is treated as belonging to individuals in a business capacity.
Braze’s privacy commitments to its customers, where we process Personal Data on behalf of our customers, are outlined in Braze’s agreements with such customers. In our capacity as a processor of our customers’ data, we will refer to ourselves as a “Data Processor.” Specifically, in that capacity, Braze processes Personal Data of people who interact with customer applications or websites that are offered by our customers and that have incorporated Braze technology (“
Customer Applications
”). The protections that apply to such Personal Data will be described in the individual privacy policies of those customers, and not in this Privacy Policy. If you wish to learn more about the privacy and data security practices of those customers, you should reach out to them directly. For clarity, this Privacy Policy does not cover any Personal Data that our customers choose to collect and share with Braze, where Braze is not the Data Controller, but is instead a Data Processor.
Individuals who are interested in, apply for, or are recruited for a job with Braze can find our related privacy practices described in our Candidate's Privacy Policy. For more details, please
view our Candidate Privacy Policy
.
Additionally, our Websites or Services (as defined below) may contain links to other websites, applications and services maintained by third parties. The privacy and data security practices of such third-party sites and/or services are governed by the privacy statements of those third parties, and not by this Privacy Policy.
PART II. DATA COLLECTION AND USE
2.1 DATA COLLECTION
The Personal Data that Braze collects will be determined by your interaction with Braze, our partners, Braze publications and other sources.
How and where do we collect data?
Braze collects Personal Data from prospects, customers, participants at our trainings, certifications and events, business partners and vendors (if they are natural persons), their respective employees, advisors, and/or consultants, along with the data of whomever our customers have authorized to use free and paid versions of the Braze services (the “
Services
”) on their behalf (collectively, “
Individuals
”), who:
Visit our websites (the “
Websites
”);
Visit our offices;
Receive/send communications from/to us, including via mail, email, phone call, Slack, chat features of our Websites, support tickets or texts;
Use our Services as an authorized user (for example, an employee of one of our customers who has been given a log-in to access our Services) (
"Dashboard User"
);
Register for, attend and/or otherwise take part in our events, webinars, contests, trainings and certification courses;
Download or otherwise engage with Braze content and publications, such as viewing our videos, reading content on our Websites, or interacting with our chat bot;
Submit requests for an action, support or information;
Participate in meetings or events;
Engage with our resellers or partners;
Work at partners or suppliers of Braze and interact with our company in the course of doing business or contemplating doing business with us; or
Otherwise directly interact with Braze.
Braze collects Personal Data from a variety of sources, such as from:
The Individual who is the subject of such Personal Data, including in their use of the Websites and the Services;
Publicly available sources, such as an individual’s social media account, online communities, forums, blogs or chat rooms;
Our business partners;
Vendors; and
Braze affiliates.
What type of data do we collect?
Personal Data that we may collect includes, but is not limited to:
Name and job title;
Contact information such as email address, business phone number, and business address;
Industry;
Employer;
Marketing subscription status;
Audio and video recordings and notes from meetings;
Event attendance and preferences associated with in-person event attendance, such as dietary requirements;
Trainings and certifications;
Downloads or engagement with Braze reports and other publications;
Communications that we exchange with you, including when you contact us with questions or feedback, through the support portal, email, calls to our support team, our chat features, social media, survey participation, or otherwise;
Certain information in connection with the use of the Websites by visitors and the Services by Dashboard Users, and information about your interaction with other relevant third-party pages displaying Braze content, which may include:
Device Data: information may include IP address (or proxy server), device and application identification numbers, location, browser type, Internet service provider and/or mobile carrier, and operating system and system configuration information; and
Usage Data: information, such as activity on the Websites and Services, the pages and files viewed, actions taken, conversations through our chat features, searches, account configuration information and date/time stamps associated with your usage.
Some of the information described above is collected through our Websites and our Services using logs, cookies and/or other tracking technologies. To read more about the cookies and tracking technologies we use, please visit our
Cookie Policy
. You are able to
manage your cookie consent preferences
.
We also use session replay technology provided by third-party vendors to record the interactions and Personal Data of Dashboard Users and visitors to certain Websites, such as our learning management system. We and such third-party vendors may use information from these recordings, which may include the Usage Data detailed above. Personal Data within these recordings may be processed for the purposes outlined in Section 2.2 of this Privacy Policy. Such recordings do not include Personal Data for which Braze is a Data Processor.
2.2 PURPOSES OF PROCESSING
Braze collects Personal Data for several purposes, including:
Enabling us to understand and engage with those who are interested in learning about our products, services, content, and company-related initiatives;
Promoting the security of our Websites and Services by tracking use of our Websites and Services, enforcing our terms and policies, investigating and preventing fraudulent, suspicious or illegal activities, and preventing unauthorized access to the Services;
Providing, operating, and maintaining the Services including billing and account management purposes;
Responding to requests for action, support or information;
Complying with our contractual obligation to provide technical and customer success support;
Registering office visitors to maintain the security of our offices and to ensure the confidentiality of our business activities;
Analyzing our customers' use of the Services and Websites for trend monitoring, marketing, advertising, business development, for improvements, for security purposes and to ensure continued proper functioning;
Marketing purposes;
To send marketing communications about us and our affiliates and partners, including information about our products, promotions or events via email and other channels;
To facilitate targeted advertising campaigns;
To send marketing communications about us and our affiliates and partners, including information about our products, promotions or events via email and other channels;
For internal training and research;
Sending messages to Dashboard Users about technical alerts, updates, security notifications, and educational, administrative or transactional communications; and
Complying and assisting with legal obligations, judicial proceedings, court orders and legal processes, pursuing remedies available to us and limiting our damages, responding to lawful requests and pursuing internal investigations.
Where we need to collect and process Personal Data by law, or under a contract we have entered into with you, and you fail to provide the required Personal Data when requested, we may not be able to comply with our legal obligations or perform our contract with you.
If you provide us with Personal Data relating to another person, you confirm that you have informed them of our identity, the purposes (as set out above) for which their Personal Data will be used, and that you have obtained their consent prior to sharing their Personal Data with us.
2.3 DISCLOSURE OF INFORMATION TO THIRD PARTIES
We may disclose Personal Data to the following types of third parties and for the following purposes:
Braze Affiliates -
We may disclose Personal Data to Braze corporate group affiliates in connection with customer or technical support, marketing, business development, operations, account management, events or webinars, for general business purposes, in order to protect, exercise, establish or defend legal rights, where we are legally required to do so and to receive professional advice.
Partners -
If you use our Websites to register for an event or webinar organized by one of our partners, we may disclose your Personal Data to these partners to process your registration and manage your participation in the event. In such instances, our partner will process the relevant Personal Data as a separate controller and the partner’s use and control over your Personal Data will be governed by their privacy policy. We may also disclose your Personal Data to technology and solutions partners in connection with customer or technical support, marketing, business development and account management.
Vendors –
We may disclose Personal Data to third party vendors and service providers for general business purposes and to support our internal operations, including IT solutions vendors, marketing vendors, advertising vendors, consultants, professional advisers acting as processors or controllers, including lawyers, bankers, auditors and insurers. We may also disclose Personal Data where we believe it necessary in order to protect or exercise, establish or defend our legal rights.
Shared Communities -
Any Personal Data or other information you choose to submit in communities, forums, blogs or chat rooms on our Websites may be read, collected and used by others who visit these forums, depending on your account settings.
Law Enforcement -
We may disclose Personal Data to a third party where we are legally required to do so in order to comply with any applicable law, regulation, legal process or governmental request, including government authorities, law enforcement and others.
Corporate Transaction Participants -
We may transfer Personal Data in connection with, or during negotiations of, any merger, sale of company assets, financing, or acquisition of all or a portion of our business to another company.
PART III. INTERNATIONAL TRANSFERS, SECURITY AND DATA RETENTION
3.1 PROCESSING OF PERSONAL DATA IN THE U.S. AND ELSEWHERE
Braze, Inc. is located in the United States ("
U.S.
") and our group companies operate in Singapore, Germany, Japan, Canada, France, Australia, Indonesia, the United Kingdom ("
UK
"), Ireland, Romania, Brazil, South Korea and the United Arab Emirates. Braze works with vendors and partners who operate predominantly in these countries. From time to time, we may work with vendors and partners in other parts of the world where we do business. This means that when we collect your Personal Data, we may process it in any of these countries. These countries may have data protection laws that are different from the laws of your country (and, in some cases, may not be as protective), but we have in place appropriate safeguards and international transfer mechanisms (e.g., the Data Privacy Framework or the EU Standard Contractual Clauses). We also implement a number of supplementary measures designed to better protect the Personal Data with which we are entrusted.
Where available, Braze, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (collectively, the “Data Privacy Framework”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce regarding the collection, use, and retention of Personal Data transferred from the European Union, the UK, and Switzerland, as applicable, to the US in reliance on the Data Privacy Framework. For more details, please
read our Data Privacy Framework Notice
.
For non-US transfers, Braze may rely on an alternative transfer mechanism, including the 2021 EU Standard Contractual Clauses, to transfer Personal Data from the UK and European Economic Area ("
EEA
") to other third-party countries.
3.2 SECURITY
We use a number of technical, organizational and administrative security measures designed to protect the security, confidentiality and integrity of information. However, security risk is inherent in internet and information technologies and we cannot guarantee the security of your Personal Data.
3.3 DATA RETENTION
We will retain Personal Data we collect from you for so long as we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (in connection with the purposes set out in Part II above). We determine the appropriate retention period for Personal Data on the basis of the purpose for which we process the Personal Data, the amount, nature and sensitivity of your Personal Data processed, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your Personal Data and whether we can achieve the purposes of the processing through other means, as well as on the basis of applicable legal requirements (such as applicable statutes of limitation). When we have no ongoing legitimate business need to process your Personal Data, we will either delete or anonymize it.
PART IV. YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
4.1 EXERCISING YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS
You may have the right under applicable law to request that we take certain actions in connection with Personal Data that we may have about you. Not all jurisdictions grant privacy rights, so whether or not you have any such rights, and the nature of those rights, if any, are determined by multiple factors, including your location, country, state, or place of residence. Privacy rights may include the following:
Information:
You may be able to request information about the categories of Personal Data we collect, the categories of sources from which we collect it, the purposes for which we process it, and the categories of third parties to whom we disclose it.
Access:
You may be able to request access to the Personal Data we hold about you.
Rectification/correction
: You may be able to request modification or correction of your Personal Data if it is inaccurate or incomplete.
Erasure/deletion:
You may be able to request that we delete Personal Data we hold about you.
Restriction:
You may be able to request that we restrict use of your Personal Data.
Objection:
You may be able to object to the processing of your Personal Data for direct marketing or where our legal basis for the processing is our legitimate interest.
Portability:
You may be able to request a copy of your Personal Data in a structured, commonly used, machine-readable format, to allow you to transfer your data to another provider.
Automated Decision Making:
You may be able to request not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, where it produces a legal or similar effect.
If you wish to exercise any of these requests, please
fill out the form provided
. We will respond to requests from individuals wishing to exercise data protection rights applicable to them. For certain rights, such as where you request access to Personal Data, we will need to confirm your identity. To verify your identity, we will require you to provide ID, where permitted or required by applicable law. You also have the right to exercise your applicable privacy rights free from discriminatory treatment and retaliation as prohibited by applicable law. These rights are not absolute, and in certain cases we may decline or partially decline your request as permitted by law.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your Personal Data. For more information, please contact your local supervisory authority. If you have a question about your privacy rights, please email us at
privacy@braze.com
.
4.2 PRIVACY RIGHTS AND BRAZE CUSTOMERS
Braze customers may collect Personal Data through their websites or applications and send that data to the Braze Services. Where you wish to enforce any of your rights in respect of such data, we encourage you to contact the customer who provides you with the Customer Application, as this will be the quickest way to have your request processed. Where you submit a request about a Braze customer and you are able to identify the customer, we forward your request to the customer to handle.
4.3 MARKETING AND ADVERTISING
At any time, you have the right to opt-out of marketing communications that we send, or object to the use of your personal data for behavioral advertising. You can exercise these rights by
visiting the Braze Preference Center
for managing your communication preferences, or by using the contact details provided under the '
How to Contact Us
' heading below. Dashboard Users of the Services may exercise this right through preference center options available within the Services. Where applicable, you may also opt-out through unsubscribe options available within the marketing communication itself.
Please note that opting-out of the receipt of marketing communications or objecting to the use of your personal data for behavioral advertising does not opt you out of receiving important business communications related to your current relationship with us, such as communications about event registrations, service announcements or security information.
4.4 COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
You can manage your cookie preferences by
visiting our Cookie Consent Manager to customize your cookie settings
. Please see our
Cookie Policy
for further information on cookies and other tracking technologies.
4.5 CHAT TECHNOLOGIES
We use chat technologies provided by third-party vendors that employ cookies and software code to operate the chat features you can use to communicate with us through our Websites. We and such third-party vendors may monitor, record and use information from your interactions with our Websites. This information includes details you have shared through online chats, data on sections of the Website you have visited, your IP address and your general geographic information (e.g., city, state). This Personal Data may be processed for the purposes outlined in Section 2.2 of this Privacy Policy.
PART V. LEGAL BASIS FOR PROCESSING PERSONAL DATA
If you are from a region that requires us to have a legal basis for processing your Personal Data, our legal basis for collecting and using the Personal Data described above will depend on the Personal Data concerned and the specific context in which we collect it.
However, we will normally collect Personal Data from you only where we have your consent to do so, where we need the Personal Data to perform a contract with you, or where the processing is in our legitimate interests and not overridden by your data protection interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. In some cases, we may also have a legal obligation to collect Personal Data from you or may otherwise need the Personal Data to protect your vital interests or those of another person.
PART VI. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
If you are a California resident, this section applies to you in addition to the rest of the Privacy Policy. It provides more detail on how we collect, use and disclose Personal Information of California residents in operating our business, and their rights with respect to that Personal Information. For purposes of this Part VI, Personal Information has the meaning given in the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (“
CCPA
”). However, this Part VI does not apply:
To information exempted from the scope of the CCPA;
To Personal Information we collect, use, and disclose on behalf of our customers as a "service provider" under the CCPA for purposes of providing our Services to them.
6.1 YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
As a California resident, you have information, access, rectification/correction, erasure/deletion, and non-discrimination rights as described in Part IV (Your Privacy Rights). In addition, you have the right to opt-out of the “sale” or “sharing” of Personal Information as those terms are defined by the CCPA.
If you have appointed an authorized agent to act on your behalf, your authorized agent may request to exercise these rights on your behalf upon our verification of the agent’s identity and our receipt of a copy of a valid power of attorney given to your authorized agent pursuant to applicable California law. If you have not provided your agent with such a power of attorney, we may ask you and/or your agent to take additional steps permitted by law to verify that your request is authorized, such as information required to verify your identity and that you have given the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
6.2 CATEGORIES OF PERSONAL DATA THAT WE COLLECT AND THIRD PARTIES TO WHOM THE DATA MAY BE DISCLOSED
The following chart describes our practices currently in use and in use during the past 12 months. This chart summarizes the Personal Information we collect by reference to the statutory categories specified in the CCPA, and the categories of third parties to whom we may disclose it for a business purpose. These third parties are defined in Section 2.3 (Disclosure of Information to Third Parties). Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms or via email, may contain other categories of Personal Information not described below. The business/commercial purposes for which we use these categories of Personal Information listed in the below table are described above in Section 2.2 (Purposes of Processing). Our relevant data retention practices are addressed in Section 3.3 (Data Retention).
6.3 THE SALE AND SHARING OF PERSONAL INFORMATION
Like many companies, Braze uses services that employ cookies and other technologies to collect Personal Information (including the identifiers and internet activity information described in the table above) about your use of our Websites and other online services over time, which helps us to deliver behavioral advertising. In addition, we may provide your contact details to our advertising vendors for the placement of targeted ads. Braze may share contact details of business contacts with our technology or solutions partners during any sales negotiations. Our use of some of these services constitutes the “sale” or “sharing” of Personal Information as defined under the CCPA.
You may opt-out of such sales or sharing by clicking on the 'Do Not Sell or Share my Personal Information'
link
in the footer of our Websites and following the instructions therein. You can also opt-out of advertising cookies by
visiting our Cookie Consent Manager to adjust your cookie preferences
, or by enabling
Global Privacy Control
(“GPC”) in your web browser or browser extension, which we recognize to the extent required by applicable law. Enabling GPC will automatically set your cookie settings to opt out of the sharing of Personal Information for behavioral advertising. If you choose to use GPC, you will need to turn it on for each supported browser or browser extension you use. Other than GPC, we do not recognize any “do not track” signals.
Dashboard Users of the Services can also opt-out of the selling or sharing of contact details through setting preference center options available within the Services.
While our Website and Services are not directed to children under the age of 16, we are required to inform you that we have no actual knowledge that we have sold or shared the Personal Information of California residents under 16 years of age.
6.4 SENSITIVE PERSONAL INFORMATION AND DE-IDENTIFIED DATA
Braze does not use or disclose Sensitive Personal Information (as defined by the CCPA) for restricted purposes that California residents have a right to limit under the CCPA.
We do not to attempt to re-identify de-identified information that we derive from Personal Information, except for the purpose of testing whether our deidentification processes comply with applicable law.
PART VII. IMPORTANT INFORMATION FOR JAPANESE VISITORS
7.1 PERSONAL DATA DISCLOSURE
Braze K.K. (“
Braze Japan
”) may disclose your Personal Data to Braze group affiliates and other third parties for the purposes described in Section 2.3 (Disclosure of Information to Third Parties). A list of the Braze office locations may be found on our
Website
. The categories or items of the Personal Data that Braze Japan may disclose to a third party are the same as those described in Section 2.1 (Data Collection). When Braze Japan discloses your Personal Data to entrusted third parties, Braze Japan shall be the entity that is responsible for processing and managing your Personal Data.
7.2 BRAZE JAPAN’S INFORMATION
Braze Japan’s official name, address, and the name of the representative director can be found
on Braze Japan's company page
. If you have any questions, requests, or complaints about our processing of your Personal Data or this Privacy Policy, please follow the instructions described in Section 8.3 (How to Contact Us).
PART VIII. OTHER IMPORTANT INFORMATION
8.1 CHANGES TO OUR PRIVACY POLICY
If we change our Privacy Policy, we will update the “Last Updated” date at the top of this webpage. We encourage you to review this Privacy Policy frequently to stay informed of the latest modifications.
8.2 CHILDREN
Our Websites are not directed to individuals under the age of 16. We do not knowingly collect Personal Data from such individuals without parental consent and require our customers to fully comply with applicable law in the data collected from children under the age of 16. If you are a parent or guardian and believe your child has provided us with Personal Data without your consent, please contact us by using the information in the “
How to Contact Us
” section, below, and we will take steps to delete such Personal Data from our systems.
8.3 HOW TO CONTACT US
If you would like to update your preferences with regards to our marketing communications to you, you can do this in our
Preference Center
.
If you have a request regarding Braze’s processing of your Personal Data, please
fill out the request form provided here
.
If you would like to manage your cookie settings you may do so by
Visiting our Cookie Consent Manager.
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, if you have a complaint, or would like to contact our DPO, you may contact us at:
privacy@braze.com
or
Braze, Inc.
Privacy Policy Issues
Attention: General Counsel
63 Madison Building
28 East 28th Street
12th Floor Mailroom
New York, NY 10016
USA
Sub-policy 1
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps